Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 81. Gristmills

§ 3001.
Posting of rates.

An owner or occupant of a gristmill shall keep posted in a conspicuous place in such mill a notice of the rates of toll demanded for grinding each kind of grain.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 262

, § 37, eff. June 11, 1959.

§ 3002.
Excessive toll; penalty.

An owner or occupant of such gristmill who exacts a greater amount of toll than is set forth in such notice shall forfeit $3.00 to the person injured to be recovered in a civil action on this statute.